Tennessee, session 114, SB0785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-3-403, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e)
(1) A regional planning commission shall not require more than one (1)
means of ingress and egress into a proposed subdivision unless the proposed
subdivision has at least seventy (70) residential dwellings.
(2) A requirement in violation of subdivision (e)(1) is void.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-4-303, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(e)
(1) A municipal planning commission shall not require more than one (1)
means of ingress and egress into a proposed subdivision unless the proposed
subdivision has at least seventy (70) residential dwellings.
(2) A requirement in violation of subdivision (e)(1) is void.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 13, Chapter 7, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A county legislative body shall not require more than one (1) means of
ingress and egress into a proposed subdivision unless the proposed subdivision has at
least seventy (70) residential dwellings.
SB0785
000899
- 1 -

(b) A requirement in violation of subsection (a) is void.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 13, Chapter 7, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A chief legislative body shall not require more than one (1) means of ingress
and egress into a proposed subdivision unless the proposed subdivision has at least
seventy (70) residential dwellings.
(b) A requirement in violation of subsection (a) is void.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 13, Chapter 7, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) A board of aldermen, board of commissioners, or other chief legislative body
of any municipality shall not require more than one (1) means of ingress and egress into
a proposed subdivision unless the proposed subdivision has at least seventy (70)
residential dwellings.
(b) A requirement in violation of subsection (a) is void.
SECTION 6. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, and applies to planning regulations
enacted or amended on or after that date.
- 2 - 000899